District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.23

Sale of measuring devices by Director prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for the Director or any employee of his office to vend any weights, measures, weighing or measuring device, or to offer or expose the same for sale, or to be interested, directly or indirectly, in the sale of same.

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1224, ch. 118, § 23
Apr. 11, 1946, 60 Stat. 88, ch. 134, § 1
Department of Weights, Measures and Markets abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 37-201.01.
1973 Ed., § 10-125.
1981 Ed., § 10-127.